District of Columbia statutes.
15-317

Remedy of marshal for erroneous sale made in good faith.

When the marshal or any other officer to whom execution has been delivered levies upon and sells in good faith property not subject thereto and applies the proceeds thereof toward the satisfaction of the judgment, and a recovery is had against him for its value, the officer, on payment of the value, may, on motion and due notice thereof to the defendant, have the satisfaction of the judgment vacated, and execution shall issue thereon for his use as if the levy and sale had not been made.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 527, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 15-301, § 47-2851.01, and § 47-2851.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-317.
1973 Ed., § 15-317.